District of Columbia statutes.
21-316

Exemption of third person from liability.

A third person, in good faith and without a court order may act on the instructions of or otherwise deal with any person purporting to make a transfer or purporting to act in the capacity of a custodian and, in the absence of knowledge of the third person, shall not be responsible for determining the following:

(1)

The validity of the purported custodian’s designation;

(2)

The propriety of, or the authority under this chapter for, any act of the purported custodian;

(3)

The validity or propriety under this chapter of any instrument or instructions executed or given either by the person purporting to make a transfer or by the purported custodian; or

(4)

The propriety of the application of any property of the minor delivered to the purported custodian.

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(c), 45 DCR 745
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 16 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.
1981 Ed., § 21-316.